Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 2 Revenue Bonds

32-10-30.
Power of authority to issue bonds generally; attributes of bonds generally.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized, at one time or from time to time, to provide by resolution for the issuance of negotiable bonds in a sum not to exceed $484 million in principal amount outstanding at any one time for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost of any one or a combination of projects; provided, however, that of such authorized amount not more than $150 million of bonds may be issued to finance county road projects, not more than $234 million of bonds may be issued to finance state road projects, and not more than $100 million of bonds may be issued to finance urban road projects. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest as provided for in Code Section 32-10-31, shall be payable in such manner of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the authority from the special funds provided in this article for such payment, shall mature not later than 30 years from the date of issuance, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. For the purpose of this Code section, bonds shall not be considered to be outstanding if there shall have been deposited into the sinking fund created for the payment of such bonds amounts sufficient to pay the same, together with the interest thereon as the bonds mature.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 14; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 15; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 11; Ga. L. 1962, p. 91, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 14; Ga. L. 1971, p. 385, § 7; Ga. L. 1972, p. 826, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-1214, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Cross references.

Revenue bonds generally, §

36-82-60

et seq.

32-10-31.
Sale of bonds by public competitive bidding; determination of sale price and interest rate.

All bonds of the authority shall be sold by public competitive bidding at not less than par plus accrued interest to the date of delivery. However, the authority may obligate itself to deliver any given issue of bonds to the purchasers thereof within any reasonable period of time after the date of sale and may pay as a penalty for delay in such delivery such reasonable sums as may be agreed upon in advance in writing with the purchaser or purchasers of such bonds. All bonds of the authority shall be advertised and offered prior to the fixing of the interest rates thereon, and bids thereon shall be competitive as to the interest rate offered by each bidder, provided that on any issue the authority may make rules limiting the number of divisions into which the bonds of various maturity dates may be divided and limiting the number and percentage spreads of the different interest rates which may be bid to apply to such divisions of the bonds; and provided, further, that the authority may require reasonable security for the performance of the contract of purchase of any successful bidder at any public bidding held.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 15; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 16; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 5; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 15; Code 1933, § 95A-1215, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-32.
Form and issuance of bonds.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company inside or outside of the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the authority may determine; and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 16; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 17; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 16; Code 1933, § 95A-1216, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32.

32-10-33.
Signing bonds; affixing authority’s seal to bonds.

In case any officer whose signature shall appear on any bonds or whose facsimile signature shall appear on any coupon shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. All such bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the authority and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the authority, and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority. Any coupon may bear the facsimile signature of such person and any bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the authority by such persons as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized to hold the proper office although at the date of such bonds such persons may not have been so authorized or shall not have held such office.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 17; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 18; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 17; Code 1933, § 95A-1217, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-34.
Bonds as negotiable instruments; tax exemption.

All bonds issued under this article shall have and are declared to have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the laws of this state. Such bonds, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation within this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 18; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 19; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 18; Code 1933, § 95A-1218, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-35.
Utilization of bond proceeds; procedure in cases where proceeds are less than or greater than cost of project or combined projects.

The proceeds of the bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or combined projects and shall be disbursed upon requisition or order of the chairman of the authority or its duly bonded agents under such restrictions, if any, as the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture may provide. If the proceeds of such bonds, by error of calculation, or otherwise, shall be less than the cost of the project or combined projects, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the amount of such deficit which, unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purpose. If the proceeds of the bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which such bonds were issued, all surplus shall be paid into the sinking fund provided for the payment of principal and interest of such bonds or shall be used for construction of additional projects as the resolution creating such bonds and the trust indenture securing them may provide.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 19; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 20; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 12; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 19; Code 1933, § 95A-1219, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-36.
Issuance of interim receipts, interim certificates, and temporary bonds.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority, under like restrictions, may issue interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds with or without coupons exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 20; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 21; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 20; Code 1933, § 95A-1220, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-37.
Replacement of lost or mutilated bonds.

The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bond which becomes mutilated or which is destroyed or lost.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 21; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 22; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 21; Code 1933, § 95A-1221, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-38.
Resolutions for bond issuance; issuance of bonds of a single issue.

Resolutions for the issuance of bonds may be adopted without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified or required by this article. In the discretion of the authority, bonds of a single issue may be issued for the purpose of paying the cost of any one or more, including a combination of, projects at any one location or any number of locations. Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under this article shall become effective immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted, and any such resolution may be passed at any regular or special or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority of its members.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 22; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 23; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 22; Code 1933, § 95A-1222, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-39.
Effect of bond issuance on state debt; recitals on face of bonds regarding such effect.

Bonds issued under this article shall not be deemed to constitute a debt of the State of Georgia or a pledge of the credit of the state, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund provided for in Code Section 32-10-42; and the issuance of such bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatsoever therefor or to make any appropriation for the payment; and all such bonds shall contain recitals on their face covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 23; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 24; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 23; Code 1933, § 95A-1223, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-40.
Trust indentures as security for bonds.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of such bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company inside or outside of the state.

Resolutions providing for the issuance of bonds and trust indentures may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders, including the right to the appointment of a receiver for any project or projects upon the default of any principal or interest payment upon the bonds thereof, and the right of any receiver or indenture trustee to enforce collections of rents, revenues, or other charges for the use of the project or projects necessary to pay all costs of operation, the principal and interest on the issue, and cost of collection, and all things reasonably necessary to accomplish the collection of such sums in the event of any default of the authority.

Such resolutions or trust indentures may include covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of the property; the construction of the project; the maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the project; and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys; may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision of department engineers or others satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued for such project or projects. Such resolution or trust indenture may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues or other moneys be satisfactory to such purchasers and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional revenue bonds may be issued.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. The trust indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations.

In addition to the foregoing, such trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem advisable, reasonable, and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project affected by such indenture or as an administrative expense of the authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 24; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 25; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 24; Code 1933, § 95A-1224, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 32.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, “rights” was substituted for “right” in the second sentence of subsection (d).

32-10-41.
Payment of bond proceeds to trustee.

The authority shall, in the resolution providing for issuance of bonds or in the trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to any officer or person who or any agency, bank, or trust company which shall act as trustee of such funds and shall hold and apply such funds as provided in this article, subject to such regulations as this article and such resolution or trust indenture may provide.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 25; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 26; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 25; Code 1933, § 95A-1225, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-42.
Pledges of revenues, rents, and earnings; creation and disposition of sinking funds.

The revenues, rents, and earnings derived from any particular project or combined projects or any and all funds from any source received by the department and pledged and allocated by it to the authority as security for the performance of any lease or leases or any and all revenues, rents, and earnings received by the authority, regardless of whether or not such rents, earnings, and revenues were produced by a particular project for which bonds have been issued, unless otherwise pledged and allocated, may be pledged by the authority to payment of principal and interest on bonds of the authority as any resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or trust instrument may provide; and such funds so pledged, from whatever source received, may include funds received from one or more or all sources and may be set aside into sinking funds at regular intervals which may be provided in any resolution or trust indenture. All such sinking funds shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of (1) the interest upon such bonds as such interest shall fall due, (2) the principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due, (3) the necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest, and (4) any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase as provided in this Code section.

The use and disposition of such sinking funds shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolutions or trust indentures, such sinking funds individually shall be funds for the benefit of all bonds without distinction or priority of one over another. Subject to the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or the trust indenture of any given bond issue, any moneys in all sinking funds, after all bonds and the interest thereon for which such sinking funds were pledged have been paid, may be paid into the authority fund provided for in Code Section 32-10-13.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 26; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 27; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 26; Code 1933, § 95A-1226, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 43; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32.

32-10-43.
Rights and remedies of holders of bonds or interest coupons, of receivers for such holders, and of indenture trustees.

Any holder of bonds or interest coupons issued under this article, any receiver for such holders, or indenture trustee, if any there be, except to the extent the rights given in this Code section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds or by the trust indenture, may either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of Georgia or granted in this Code section or under such resolution or trust indenture. Also, any holder of bonds or interest coupons issued under this article, any receiver for such holders, or any indentured trustee may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this article or by resolution or trust indenture to be performed by the authority or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of revenues, rents, and other charges for the use of the project or projects; and, in the event of default of the authority upon the principal and interest obligations of any bond issue, the individual, receiver, or trustee specified in this Code section shall be subrogated to each and every right, specifically including the contract rights of collecting rentals, which the authority may possess against the board and the department or either of them or their respective successors; and, in the pursuit of their remedies as subrogee, such individual, receiver, or trustee may proceed, either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings to collect any sums by such proceedings due and owing to the authority and pledged or partially pledged directly or indirectly to the benefit of the bond issue of which said individual, receiver, or trustee is representative. No holder of any such bond or receiver or indenture trustee thereof shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state; nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon the property of the state. However, any provision of this article or any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any such bondholder or receiver or indenture trustee shall have the right by appropriate legal or equitable proceedings, including without being limited to mandamus, to enforce compliance by the appropriate public officials with Article VII, Section IV and Article III, Section IX, Paragraph VI(b) of the Constitution of Georgia; and permission is given for the institution of any such proceedings to compel the payment of lease obligations.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 27; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 28; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 13; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 27; Code 1933, § 95A-1227, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 56.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, in the second sentence “rentals” was substituted for “rental”.

32-10-44.
Refunding bonds.

The authority is authorized, subject to any prior resolution or trust indenture, to provide by resolution for the issuance of refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under this article and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such refunding bonds, the maturities and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by this article insofar as it may be applicable.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 28; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 29; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 28; Code 1933, § 95A-1228, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, in the second sentence “holders” was substituted for “holder”.

32-10-45.
Investment of funds in bonds; deposit of bonds as securities.

The bonds authorized in Code Section 32-10-30 are deemed securities in which (1) all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and all municipal subdivisions, (2) all insurance companies and associations and other persons carrying on an insurance business, (3) all banks, bankers, trust companies, savings banks and savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, (4) all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and (5) all other persons whatsoever who are now or hereafter may be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. The bonds are also deemed securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and municipal subdivisions for any purpose for which the deposit of the bonds or other obligations of this state is now or hereafter may be authorized.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 29; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 30; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 29; Code 1933, § 95A-1229, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-46.
Protection of interests and rights of bondholders.

While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority or of its officers, employees, or agents shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds; nor will the state itself in any way obstruct, prevent, impair, or render impossible the due and faithful performance by its board and department, or either of them, or their successors, of all project rental and lease contracts and all the covenants thereof entered into under this article. This article shall be for the benefit of the state, the authority, and each and every holder of the authority’s bonds and upon and after the issuance of bonds under this article shall constitute an irrevocable contract with the holders of such bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 34; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 35; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 15; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 34; Code 1933, § 95A-1234, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-47.
Confirmation and validation of bonds.

Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36, the “Revenue Bond Law.”

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 33; Ga. L. 1961, p. 3, § 14; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 32; Code 1933, § 95A-1232, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-48.
Adjudication regarding lease contracts and rental income.

In and as an integral but independent part of the bond validation proceedings under this article, or separately, the authority is given the right to and privilege of a simultaneous or separate right of action or equitable bill against the state, the board, and the department for a declaratory adjudication of the validity and binding effect of all lease contracts whose rental income may be pledged or partially pledged to the benefit of any bonds being validated. In each instance of the exercise of this right the actual controversy shall be whether or not the purported contracts contested are in all respects good and sufficient, valid, and binding obligations of the board and department. Any citizens of the state may intervene in such actions and assert any ground of objection. It shall be incumbent upon the board and department to defend against an adjudication of such validity or be forever bound unto the authority and all succeeding to the rights of the authority thereafter. Such adjudications may be rendered as an integral but independent part of the judgment upon the validation issue with which they are contested or may be rendered separately.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 33; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 34; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 33; Code 1933, § 95A-1233, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-10-49.
Covenant with holders of bonds as to tax-exempt status of authority property and bonds.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this article; and this state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the projects erected by it or upon any fees, rental, or other charges for the use of such projects or upon other income received by the authority and that the bonds of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation from within the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 30; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 31; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 30; Code 1933, § 95A-1230, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, “are” was substituted for “is” following “corporate purposes” near the beginning.

32-10-50.
Venue and jurisdiction of actions.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this article and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under this article brought in the courts of this state shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County, which shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of such actions.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 626, § 31; Ga. L. 1955, p. 124, § 32; Ga. L. 1967, p. 385, § 31; Code 1933, § 95A-1231, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.